Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2605
Status of guardian of minor; general.

A person becomes a guardian of a minor by acceptance of a testamentary appointment or upon appointment by the court. The guardianship status continues until terminated, without regard to the location from time to time of the guardian and minor ward.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 223, UPC § 5-201.

Guardian ad litem, appointment, see section 43-272.01.